Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.810

Opioid drugs—Right to refuse. (Effective until June 30, 2027.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

By January 1, 2020, the *commission must adopt or amend its rules to require advanced registered nurse practitioners who prescribe opioids to inform patients of their right to refuse an opioid prescription or order for any reason. If a patient indicates a desire to not receive an opioid, the advanced registered nurse practitioner must document the patient's request and avoid prescribing or ordering opioids, unless the request is revoked by the patient.

[2019 c 314 s 10.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to "nursing care quality assurance commission" was changed to "board of nursing" by 2023 c 123.

Declaration—2019 c 314: See note following RCW 18.22.810.

PDFRCW 18.79.810

Opioid drugs—Right to refuse. (Effective June 30, 2027.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

By January 1, 2020, the board must adopt or amend its rules to require advanced practice registered nurses who prescribe opioids to inform patients of their right to refuse an opioid prescription or order for any reason. If a patient indicates a desire to not receive an opioid, the advanced practice registered nurse must document the patient's request and avoid prescribing or ordering opioids, unless the request is revoked by the patient.

[2024 c 239 s 20; 2019 c 314 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 239: See note following RCW 18.79.030.

Declaration—2019 c 314: See note following RCW 18.22.810.